Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1634
Maintenance of improvements; county responsibility; reimbursement by district.

The maintenance and care of the improvements shall be performed by the county or counties in which such district is located but the district shall reimburse the county or counties for such costs up to the limits of funds provided for in the adopted budget statement which are available from the maintenance tax, after paying other costs of operation of the district from such tax.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 34, p. 539;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 36, p. 695;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 160.